Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1405
Adaptive management plan; contents.

The adaptive
management plan required under section 37-1404 will address the following:

(1) Statewide
coordination and intergovernmental cooperation;

(2) Prioritization of
invasive species response and management;

(3) Early detection and prevention of new
invasive species through deliberate or unintentional introduction;

(4) Inventory
and monitoring of invasive species;

(5) Identification of research and information
gaps;

(6) Public outreach and education;

(7) Identification of
funding and resources available for invasive species prevention, control,
and management; and

(8) Recommendations for legislation regarding invasive species issues.

Laws 2012, LB391, § 15.